Nebraska, session 109, LB673.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB673 LB673
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 61-302, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
61-302 (1) The Legislature finds that it is essential to the
economic prosperity, health, and welfare of the people of the State of
Nebraska, and to the environmental health of the entire Platte River
Basin, to protect Nebraska's full entitlement to the flows of the South
Platte River as provided for in the South Platte River Compact. The South
Platte River Compact is the law of Nebraska and of the United States that
specifically authorizes Nebraska to develop a canal and associated
storage facilities for the diversion of water from the South Platte River
for beneficial use in Nebraska.
(2) The Legislature declares that a canal and associated storage
facilities, which shall be known as the Perkins County Canal Project, may
shall be developed, constructed, managed, and operated under the
authority of the State of Nebraska consistent with the South Platte River
Compact and pursuant to the Perkins County Canal Project Act.
Sec. 2. Section 61-305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
61-305 (1) The Perkins County Canal Project Fund is created. The
fund shall be administered by the Department of Natural Resources. The
State Treasurer shall credit to the fund any money transferred by the
Legislature and such grants, loans, donations, gifts, bequests, or other
money received from any federal or state agency or public or private
source for use by the department for the canal project. Any fees
collected for water delivery may be credited to the fund. Any money in
the Perkins County Canal Project Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any investment
earnings from investment of money in the Perkins County Canal Project
Fund shall be credited to such fund, except that for fiscal years
2023-24, 2024-25, and 2025-26, such investment earnings shall be credited
-2-

LB673 LB673
2025 2025
as provided in section 84-622.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer five hundred million dollars
from the Perkins County Canal Project Fund to the Water Sustainability
Fund on or before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(3)(a) (2)(a) The department shall use the Perkins County Canal
Project Fund to identify the optimal route and purchase land for and
develop, construct, manage, and operate the Perkins County Canal as
outlined by the South Platte River Compact and to contract with an
independent firm for the purposes of completing a study of such canal.
The study shall include, but may not be limited to, the following:
(i) Costs of completion of a canal and adjoining reservoirs as
outlined in the South Platte River Compact;
(ii) A timeline for completion of a canal and adjoining reservoirs
as outlined in the South Platte River Compact;
(iii) A cost-effectiveness study examining alternatives, including
alternatives that may reduce environmental or financial impacts; and
(iv) The impacts of the canal on drinking water supplies for the
cities of Lincoln and Omaha.
(b) The department shall provide the findings of such study
electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature and present the findings
at a public hearing held by the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature on or before December 31, 2022.
Sec. 3. Original sections 61-302 and 61-305, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-